Illinois, session 104th, SB2633.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to Chicago 7Survivors for family and community services. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.